Louisiana, session 2026, HB434.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:492(A)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§492. Probation and tenure of bus operators
A. Each school bus operator shall serve a probationary term of three years
reckoned from the date of his first employment in the city, parish, or other local
public school system in which the operator is serving his probation. During the
probationary term, the superintendent city, parish, or other local public school board
may dismiss or discharge any operator upon the written recommendation of the local
superintendent of schools accompanied by valid reasons therefor providing the
operator with written reasons therefor and providing the operator with the
opportunity to respond. The operator shall have seven calendar days from such
written notice to respond, in person or in writing, and such response shall be included
in the operator's personnel file. A school board shall immediately dismiss or
discharge an operator who is convicted of or has pled nolo contendere to a violation
of a parish or municipal ordinance that prohibits operating a vehicle while
intoxicated or any of the following offenses relative to operating a vehicle while
intoxicated, regardless of whether the violation occurred while the operator was
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 434 ENROLLED
performing an official duty or responsibility as a school bus operator at the time of
the offense:
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.